Washington statutes.
RCW 38.20.030

Counties may expend moneys for armory site.

Any county of the state of Washington is hereby authorized and empowered to appropriate money for the purchase of an armory site whenever the legislature of this state shall appropriate money for or authorize the construction of an armory therein.

[1907 c 55 s 3 1/2; No RRS.]